Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4943.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION TAX HOLIDAY.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin New purchases. new text end new text begin For all new and used vehicles purchased and registered in the state on or after January 1, 2027, and on or before December 31, 2027, the vehicle registration tax imposed under Minnesota Statutes, section 168.013, is waived. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Registration renewals. new text end new text begin (a) For all motor vehicle registration renewals due on or after January 1, 2027, and on or before December 31, 2027, the vehicle registration is automatically extended for 12 additional months and the tax imposed under Minnesota Statutes, section 168.013, is waived. new text end new text begin (b) New license plate tabs must not be issued for motor vehicle registrations automatically extended under this subdivision. The existing license plate tabs must be retained on the motor vehicle and remain valid for 12 months after the motor vehicle registration is automatically extended under this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Electric vehicle surcharges. new text end new text begin (a) The provisions under subdivisions 1 and 2 do not apply to electric vehicle surcharges payable under Minnesota Statutes, section 168.013, subdivision 1m. new text end new text begin (b) The provisions under subdivisions 1 and 2 do not apply to plug-in hybrid electric vehicle surcharges payable under Minnesota Statutes, section 168.013, subdivision 1n. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end